North Dakota, session 69, SB2170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new chapter to title 15 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Definitions.
For purposes of this chapter:
1. "Active duty" means full-time service pursuant to an executive order of the president of
the United States or the governor or an act of the congress of the United States.
2. "Institution of higher education" means an institution at which the applicant is enrolled
in:
a. A degree-granting program, whether the institution is under the control of the
state board of higher education or privately controlled;
b. An in - state nursing education program approved by the North Dakota board o f
nursing; or
c. A program for a high - demand occupation identified under subsection 3 of section
15 - 10 - 38.1 .
Army forces reserve component scholarship program - State board of higher
education.
1. The state board of higher education shall:
a. Administer the army forces reserve component scholarship program.
b. Approve all eligible applicants.
c. Process applications for the scholarship in the order received.
d. Provide scholarships regardless of the financial need of the applicant.
Page No. 1 25.0522.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. The board may not grant priority to an applicant based on sex, race, or religion.
Eligible applicant - Eligibility units.
1. An eligible applicant:
a. Is a member of a reserve component of the United States army, navy, marine
corps, air force, coast guard, or space force in the state;
b. Is enrolled as a full-time student at an institution of higher education;
c. Does not possess a baccalaureate degree; and
d. Has not received financial assistance under chapters 37 - 07.1 or 37 - 07.2 .
2. An individual who is discharged from a branch of the armed forces under other than
honorable conditions is not eligible for a scholarship under this chapter.
3. A recipient of the scholarship may receive a scholarship for no more than forty-eight
eligibility units.
4. For purposes of this section, twelve or more credit hours in an academic term equals:
a. Twelve eligibility units, if the term is a semester.
b. Eight eligibility units, if the term is a quarter.
Scholarship amounts.
1. Subject to legislative appropriations, the state board of higher education shall pay on
behalf of an eligible applicant:
a. An amount equal to one hundred percent of the tuition charged by the institution,
if an eligible applicant is enrolled at an institution of higher education under the
control of the state board of higher education; or
b. The lesser of an amount equal to:
(1) One hundred percent of the tuition charged by the institution; or
(2) The average tuition of all institutions of higher education under the control of
the state board of higher education.
2. The state board of higher education may require:
a. An applicant to apply for federal educational financial assistance programs,
including programs offered by the United States department of defense, for which
an applicant is eligible based on the applicant's military service.
Page No. 2 25.0522.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. Other financial assistance received by a scholarship recipient be applied to
eligible expenses before scholarship funds awarded under this section may be
applied to the remaining eligible expenses of the recipient.
Active duty - Effects.
If an eligible applicant is called to active duty and as a result withdraws or otherwise fails to
complete courses for which scholarships have been awarded under this chapter:
1. The institution of higher education shall grant the individual a leave of absence from
the individual's education program and may not impose an academic penalty for
withdrawal or failure to complete courses.
2. If a scholarship for the courses has already been paid, the state board of higher
education:
(a) May not add the eligibility units for the term to the individual's accumulated
eligibility units, and the institution of higher education shall repay the scholarship
amount to the state; or
(b) Shall add the eligibility units for the term to the individual's accumulated eligibility
units as usual, if the institution of higher education agrees to allow the individual
to complete the remainder of the courses in which the individual was enrolled at
the time the individual was called to active duty.
State board of higher education - Rules.
The state board of higher education may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 28 - 32 necessary
to implement and administer this chapter.
Page No. 3 25.0522.01000